Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.435

Finance or loan for purchase of dog or cat—Prohibition.

A licensee shall not finance or make a loan for the purchase of a dog or cat. A loan entered into on or after July 23, 2023, for the purchase of a dog or cat is void and unenforceable and the licensee shall have no right to collect, receive, or retain any principal, interest, or charges related to the loan.

[ 2023 c 208 s 6.]